test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-keestes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeeʹstes e-stem pöllö: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩeeʹstes
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩeâsttsa
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩeâsttsest
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩeâsttsin
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Ess+Indef: ǩeâsttsen
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Par+Indef: ǩeâsttsed
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâsttataa, ǩeâsttatää]
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩeâstta
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩeâsttsi
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩeâsttsid
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩeâsttsid
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩeâsttsin
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩeâsttsivuiʹm
     ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâsttsitaa, ǩeâsttsitää]
